Massachusetts, session 194th, S1365.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of said chapter 29 is hereby amended by adding the following
paragraph:-
The operating budget in the current and ensuing fiscal years shall include the
appropriation necessary to fund all incremental cost items for all years covered by any collective
bargaining agreement to which either the board of trustees of the university of Massachusetts or
the board of higher education is a party, separate and apart from any appropriation for the
general maintenance of the university or public institutions of higher education where the board
of higher education is the employer for purposes of collective bargaining under chapter 150E,
excluding grant funded and auxiliary enterprises accounts funded positions.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding section 8 of chapter 32A of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the cost of fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the
of 2

cost of pensions and health insurance, associated with employees of a public institution of higher
education as defined in section 5 of chapter 15A, shall be the obligation of the commonwealth,
excluding grant funded and auxiliary enterprises accounts funded positions.
SECTION 3. Subsection (c) of section 7 of Chapter 150E, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is amended in the second paragraph by inserting after the second sentence the
following sentence:-
The board of higher education and the board of trustees of the University of
Massachusetts shall include in any such submission a certification that the incremental cost items
in such collective bargaining agreement are adequate to ensure that average salaries for faculty
and staff employed at a Massachusetts institution of public higher education will, by the end of
the contract terms, for each job category, be not less than the national average, adjusted for state
cost of living.
of 2